Hawaii statutes.
§342J-6 Furnishing of information and entry
and inspection of premises. (a) For purposes of enforcing the provisions
of this chapter, any person who generates, stores, treats, transports, disposes
of, or otherwise handles or has handled hazardous waste shall, upon request of
any duly authorized representative of the director, furnish information
relating to such wastes and permit such representative at all reasonable times
to have access to, and to copy all records relating to such wastes.

(b) For purposes of enforcing the provisions
of this chapter the authorized representative may:

(1) Enter at reasonable times any establishment or
other place where hazardous wastes are or have been generated, stored, treated,
disposed of, or transported from;

(2) Inspect and obtain samples of any such wastes and
samples of any containers or labeling for such wastes; and

(3) Obtain any other information for purposes of
determining compliance with the provisions of this chapter, including financial
information.

Each such inspection shall be commenced and
completed with reasonable promptness. [L 1989, c 212, pt of §5; am L 1991, c
259, §7]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next